Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2725
Issuance of bonds; immunity.

The members of a city's governing body and any person executing bonds under section 18-2724 shall not be liable personally on such bonds by reason of the issuance thereof.

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 2.